Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4043.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-120.07, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-120.07. School employee training; high school sports; automatic external defibrillators; definitions A. Beginning August 1, 2027, each school district and charter school in this state shall ensure that there is at least one employee at each school campus during REGULAR school hours who has successfully completed the following: 1. a training course in Cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid that follows nationally recognized cardiovascular care guidelines. 2. If there is at least one automated external defibrillator at the school campus, a training course in the use of automated external defibrillators that follows nationally recognized cardiovascular care guidelines. A. B. Notwithstanding title 36, chapter 21.1, article 3, beginning August 1, 2026, each public school in this state that provides instruction to students in any of grades nine through twelve and that sponsors an athletic team or sports program shall: 1. Provide an automated external defibrillator at each school campus and school-sponsored athletic event. 2. Ensure that each automated external defibrillator that is provided pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection is all of the following: (a) In an unlocked location that is clearly marked and easily accessible both during the school day and at each school-sponsored athletic event. (b) In a location from which the automated external defibrillator may be promptly retrieved and used at the school or school-sponsored athletic event. (c) In a location that complies with guidelines that are established by a nationally recognized organization that is focused on emergency cardiovascular care. (d) Maintained in good working order and tested according to the manufacturer's guidelines. B. C. A school district or charter school may accept gifts, grants, donations and in-kind donations for the purposes of this section, including to purchase and maintain automated external defibrillators. C. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Automated external defibrillator" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2261. 2. "School-sponsored athletic event": (a) Means an event that takes place on a school campus and that is related to a sport or other athletic activity in which students participate as individuals or as members of a team. (b) Includes scheduled practices, trainings and competitions. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.